Louisiana, session 2026, HB899.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Chapter 9-C of Subtitle I of Title 30 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of
1950, to be comprised of R.S. 30:971 through 989 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
CHAPTER 9-C. LOUISIANA NONCOAL SURFACE MINING LAW
§971. Title
This Chapter shall be known and cited as "The Louisiana Noncoal Surface
Mining Law".
§972. Declaration of policy
It is hereby declared to be the policy of this state to provide for the
reclamation and conservation of land subjected to surface disturbance by mining and
Page 1 of 19
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-567 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 899
thereby to preserve natural resources; to encourage the productive use of such lands
after mining; to aid in the protection of wildlife and aquatic resources; to encourage
the planting of trees, grasses, and other vegetation; to protect and perpetuate the
taxable value of property; to aid in the prevention of erosion, landslides, floods, and
the pollution of waters and air; to protect the ground water resources of the state; to
protect the natural beauty and aesthetic values in the affected areas of this state; to
protect and to promote the health, safety, and general welfare of the people of this
state; and to establish a regulatory system of permits and reclamation standards,
supplemented by the knowledge, expertise, and concerns of the mining industry,
landowners, and the general public which is designed to achieve an acceptable,
workable balance between the economic necessities of developing our natural
resources and the public interest in protecting our environment, acknowledging those
industry practices viewed to be customary, beneficial, and in harmony with the stated
declaration.
§973. Jurisdiction
A. It is the intent of the legislature that this Chapter vests the state with
exclusive jurisdiction over noncoal surface mine reclamation and conservation of
land subjected to surface disturbance by associated mining activities, including but
not limited to regulations, permitting, and related fee schedules, and no other
governmental entity, including any political subdivision or governing authority, shall
have jurisdiction over this subject matter nor the authority to enact any local or
special law or ordinance affecting this subject.
B. The Department of Conservation and Energy is hereby designated as the
official agency whose duty it is to administer the regulations and guidelines
contained in this Chapter and to institute such other reasonable regulations and
guidelines, after notice and public hearing, as may become necessary pursuant to this
Chapter to protect state and private lands from unreasonable degradation by any
operator engaged in noncoal surface mining operations.
§974. Powers and duties
Page 2 of 19
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-567 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 899
In addition to the duties and powers conferred on the office in other
provisions of this Chapter, the secretary shall have the authority and power to:
(1) Adopt and promulgate reasonable rules and regulations respecting the
administration of this Chapter and in conformity therewith in accordance with the
Administrative Procedure Act.
(2) Order, after hearing, the revocation of any permit issued hereunder for
violation of this Chapter.
(3) Cause to be instituted, in any court of competent jurisdiction, legal
proceedings for injunctive or other appropriate relief to enforce this Chapter.
(4) Make investigations and inspections and take appropriate enforcement
actions, including assessment of civil penalties which are necessary or appropriate
to insure compliance with this Chapter.
(5) Collect and disseminate information relating to reclamation of affected
lands.
(6) To hold hearings relative to the approval, denial, termination, suspension,
or reinstatement of any mining permit or relative to violations of this Chapter or the
rules and regulations of the office of conservation.
§975. Definitions
As used in this Chapter, unless a different meaning clearly appears from the
context:
(1) "Abandoned noncoal mine lands" means the area of land abandoned or
mined before the effective date of this Chapter and determined by the department to
be eligible for reclamation.
(2) "Affected land" means the area of land mined after the effective date of
this Chapter from which overburden shall have been removed, or upon which
overburden, spoil, or refuse has been deposited.
(3) "Box cut" means the first open cut in strip mining which results in the
placing of overburden on unmined land adjacent to the initial pit and outside the area
to be mined.
Page 3 of 19
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-567 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 899
(4) "Conservation agent" means any authorized employee of the Department
of Conservation and Energy.
(5) "Consolidated material" means material of sufficient hardness or ability
to resist weathering and to inhibit erosion or sloughing.
(6) "Department of Conservation and Energy" or "department" means the
Department of Conservation and Energy of the state of Louisiana.
(7) "Disturbed land" or "land disturbed" means:
(a) The mine area from which overburden has been removed in the mining
operation.
(b) The mine area covered by spoil.
(c) Any mine areas used in the mining operations which by virtue of their
use are susceptible to excessive erosion including all mine lands disturbed by the
construction or improvement of haulageways, roads, or trails.
(8) "Land use" means specific uses or management-related activities, rather
than the vegetation or cover of the land. Land uses may be identified in combination
when joint or seasonal uses occur. Land use includes the following:
(a) Forestry: Land used or managed for the long-term production of wood,
wood fiber, or wood derived products. Land used for facilities in support of forest
harvest and management operations which is adjacent to or an integral part of these
operations is also included.
(b) Pastureland: Land used primarily for the long-term production of
adapted, domesticated forage plants to be grazed by livestock or occasionally cut and
cured for livestock feed. Land used for facilities in support of pastureland or land
occasionally cut for hay which is adjacent to or an integral part of these operations
is also included.
(c) Recreation: Land used for public or private leisure-time use, including
developed recreational facilities such as parks, camps, and amusement areas, as well
as areas for less intensive uses such as hiking, canoeing, and other undeveloped
recreational uses.
Page 4 of 19
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-567 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 899
(d) Developed water resources: Includes land used for storing water for
beneficial uses such as stockponds, irrigation, fire protection, flood control, and
water supply.
(e) Fish and wildlife habitat: Land dedicated wholly or partially to the
production, protection, or management of species of fish or wildlife.
(f) Cropland: Land used for the production of adapted crops for harvest,
alone or in a rotation with grasses and legumes, and includes row crops, small grain
crops, hay crops, nursery crops, orchard crops, and other similar specialty crops.
Land used for facilities in support of cropland farming operations which is adjacent
to or an integral part of these operations is also included for purposes of these
land-use categories.
(g) Residential: Includes single-family and multiple-family housing, mobile
home parks, and other residential lodgings. Land used for facilities in support of
residential operations which is adjacent to or an integral part of these operations is
also included. Support facilities include but are not limited to vehicle parking and
open space that directly relate to the residential use.
(h) Industrial/commercial:
(i) Land used for extraction or transformation of materials for fabrication of
products, wholesaling of products or for long-term storage of products. This
includes all heavy and light manufacturing facilities such as lumber and wood
processing, chemical manufacturing, petroleum refining, and fabricated metal
products manufacture. Land used for facilities in support of these operations which
is adjacent to or an integral part of that operation is also included. Support facilities
include but are not limited to all rails, roads, and other transportation facilities.
(ii) Land used for retail or trade of goods or services, including hotels,
motels, stores, restaurants, and other commercial establishments. Land used for
facilities in support of commercial operations which is adjacent to or an integral part
of these operations is also included. Support facilities include but are not limited to
parking, storage, or shipping facilities.
Page 5 of 19
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-567 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 899
(9) "Mine" means a surface excavation and development with or without
slopes, drifts, or tunnels for the extraction of minerals, with hoisting or haulage
equipment and appliances for the extraction thereof, and shall embrace any and all
of the land or property of the plan and the surface that contributes directly to the
mining properties, concentration, or handling of minerals, excluding private roads,
pipeline, and oil and gas operations.
(10) "Minerals" means sand, gravel, dirt, clay, shale, gypsum, limestone,
anhydrite, dolomite, sandstone, other stone, iron ore, limonite, siderite, glauconite,
goethite, uranium, metalliferous or nonmetalliferous ore, or other material or
substance of commercial value excavated in a solid state from natural deposits on or
in the earth, but does not include coal/lignite or peat, slate, salt, sulphur, oil, gas, and
any other mineral found naturally in a liquid or gaseous state.
(11) "Mining" means the extraction of minerals from natural deposits by any
method or process.
(12) "Operator" means any person, partnership, corporation, or governmental
entity engaged in noncoal surface mining who removes or intends to remove
minerals from the earth by surface mining methods.
(13) "Overburden" means all of the earth and other materials which lie above
natural deposits of minerals, and also means such earth and other materials disturbed
from their natural state in the process of surface mining.
(14) "Peak" means a projecting point of overburden created in the surface
mining process.
(15) "Permit area" means the area designated as such in a permit application
and shall include all land to be affected by the surface mining operations during the
term of the permit and may include any contiguous permitted area which the operator
proposes to surface mine thereafter.
(16) "Person" means an individual, partnership, association, society, joint
stock company, firm, company, corporation, governmental agency, political
subdivision, or other business organization.
Page 6 of 19
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-567 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 899
(17) "Pit" means a tract of land from which overburden or minerals have
been or are being removed in the process of surface mining.
(18) "Reclamation" means conditioning affected land to make it suitable for
any uses or purposes consistent with those enumerated in R.S. 30:972.
(19) "Reclamation plan" means the applicant's written proposal for
reclamation of the affected areas including land-use objectives, maps, or other
documents as required to describe reclamation, grading specifications, and manner
and type of revegetation.
(20) "Refuse" means all waste material, slag, trash, garbage, junk, rubbish,
and scrap iron material which is considered worthless or useless and is to be recycled
or destroyed.
(21) "Ridge" means a lengthened elevation of overburden created in the
surface mining process.
(22) "Secretary of the Department of Conservation and Energy" or
"secretary" means the secretary of the Department of Conservation and Energy of the
state of Louisiana.
(23) "Spoil" means that material directly associated with a mineral deposit
which is separated from the mineral in the process of mining, including material
commonly known as debris, gangue, tailings or waste, and overburden.
(24) "Strip mining" means those mining operations carried out by removing
the overburden lying above natural deposits of minerals, and mining directly from
such natural deposits thereby exposed, but excludes auger mining, quarrying,
dredging, pumping, or the use of hydraulic methods.
(25) "Surface mining" means those mining operations carried out on the
surface, including strip mining, auger mining, quarrying, dredging, pumping, or the
use of hydraulic methods. Surface mining shall not include the handling, processing,
or storage of refuse on the premises of a manufacturer as a part of the manufacturing
process.
Page 7 of 19
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-567 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 899
§976. Funding
A. The noncoal mine land reclamation activity shall be funded by the
following revenue sources provided for by this Chapter, in particular the following:
(1) Monies granted by the federal government for purposes of this Chapter.
(2) Monies appropriated by the legislature for purposes of this Chapter.
B. The revenues provided for in Subsection A of this Section shall be
deposited in the general fund. No expenditures shall be made from the revenues
derived in Subsection A of this Section unless first appropriated by the legislature.
C. The secretary shall use the monies appropriated by the legislature to
accomplish reclamation of lands covered by this Chapter, particularly abandoned
noncoal mine lands, subject to the Louisiana Public Bid Law, R.S. 38:2211 et seq.,
and the monies shall be used to defray the administrative costs of this Chapter.
§977. Permits
A. It shall be unlawful for any operator to engage in any mining operations
in this state without first obtaining from the department a permit to do so for each
separate mining operation in such form as is provided in this Chapter. The office
shall determine what constitutes a separate mining operation by rules and regulations
promulgated under this Chapter. Any operator engaged in noncoal mining prior to
the effective date of this Chapter may continue to operate pending submission and
approval of a permit application. No new noncoal mining operations shall be
initiated after the effective date of this Act, without a permit issued by the
department in accordance with this Chapter. Within six months of the effective date
of this Act, operators of existing noncoal mining operations shall apply for a mine
operations permit in accordance with the provisions of this Section.
B. Any operator desiring to engage in surface mining shall make written
application to the office of conservation for a permit. Each permit may be issued for
the life of the mine, or such lesser period as designated on the application.
Application for such permit shall be made upon a form furnished by the department,
which form shall contain a description of the tract or tracts of land and the estimated
Page 8 of 19
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-567 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 899
number of acres thereof to be affected by surface mining by the operator, which
description shall include the section, township, range, and parish in which the land
is located, and shall otherwise describe the land with sufficient certainty so that it
may be located and distinguished from other lands, and a statement that the operator
has the right and power by legal estate owned to mine by surface mining the land so
described.
C. Each application for a permit under Subsection B of this Section shall be
accompanied by a five-year plan of reclamation of the affected land that meets the
requirements of this Chapter. The initial five-year plan of reclamation shall include
maps and descriptive narratives setting forth all of the following:
(1) The proposed use to be made of the affected land.
(2) The grading to be accomplished.
(3) The type of revegetation to be accomplished.
(4) The approximate time schedule of grading and initial revegetation efforts.
(5) An approximate time schedule for the completion of each phase of
reclamation.
D. Subsequent five-year plans of reclamation shall be submitted within six
months before the end of the previous five-year period, and shall include all
information specified for the initial five-year plan along with indications of mining
and reclamation accomplished to date.
E. Each application for a permit under Subsection B of this Section shall be
accompanied by a fee of one thousand dollars, which shall be deposited in the
Noncoal Mine Land Reclamation Fund of the state treasury. The permit fee shall be
due and payable every five years during the life of the mine, unless the permit has
been terminated or revoked pursuant to this Chapter or voluntarily terminated by the
operator.
F. Upon the receipt of such application and fee due from the operator, the
department shall review the material submitted and upon the finding by the
department that the submitted material is complete and meets the requirements of
Page 9 of 19
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-567 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 899
this Chapter, the department shall issue a surface mining permit to the applicant,
which shall entitle him to engage thereafter in mining on the land described therein.
G. An operator desiring to have his permit amended to cover additional land,
or to modify the five-year plan of reclamation, may file an amended application with
the department. Upon receipt of the amended application and such additional fee,
not to exceed five hundred dollars, the department shall issue an amendment to the
original permit covering the additional land described in the amended application.
H. Permits issued under this Chapter to an operator shall not be transferred
to another operator without prior approval of the department. An additional fee set
by the secretary, not to exceed five hundred dollars, may be charged to administer
an approved transfer.
I. All fees levied pursuant to this Section and collected shall be placed in the
state general fund.
§978. Buffer Zones
In the case of surface mining operations to be conducted in close enough
proximity to adjacent property boundaries to impose risks of slope failures,
landslides, or critical erosional problems, appropriate buffers, barriers, or other
mechanisms must be provided, unless waived pursuant to written agreement between
the operator and the adjacent property owner.
§979. Procedure of reclaiming land
A. All affected land, other than lands affected by lignite coal mining
operations, shall be reclaimed as provided in this Section.
B. The operator shall determine which parts of the affected land and permit
area shall be reclaimed to support post-mining land uses as defined in this Chapter
including forestry, pastureland, recreation, developed water resources, fish and
wildlife habitat, cropland, residential, industrial/commercial, or other such use
approved by the secretary.
C. All refuse and spoil disposal areas shall be reclaimed or treated, or the
material shall be removed or contained by the operator. The piles, ridges, and peaks
Page 10 of 19
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-567 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 899
of overburden and spoil created by surface mining shall be graded to a topographic
condition traversable by machines or equipment customarily used in connection with
the use to be made of the land after reclamation, but such slopes need not be reduced
to less than the original grade of the area prior to mining, and the slope of the ridge
of overburden resulting from a box cut need not be graded flatter than a two to one
horizontal to vertical ratio.
D. The operator may construct earthen dams to form lakes in pits resulting
from surface mining operations, provided that the formation of lakes shall not
interfere with other mining operations or damage property of others.
E. The operator shall cover the exposed face of a mineral seam, where
significant concentrations of acid-forming materials are present, to a depth of not less
than three feet with earth that will support plant life or with a permanent water
impoundment.
F. The operator shall grade the banks of any pits or depressions created by
the removal of minerals by surface mining to a degree of slope appropriate, in
consideration of site-specific conditions, to assure long-term mass stability and
prevent mass deformation, movement, or failure of the banks of such pits or
depressions.
G. All affected land, except that which is to be covered with water, shall be
appropriately treated and reclaimed to prevent excess erosion and resultant sediment
loadings in adjacent streams. Off-site sediment loadings shall be minimized through
stabilization of erosive soils or use of appropriate sediment basins or traps. Soil
stabilization practices to be used for erosion and sediment control shall include
mechanical treatment, promotion of natural revegetation and revegetation by
planting and post emergence management of seeds, plants, trees, shrubs, or other
plantings appropriate to the use to be made of the land as determined by the operator
and approved by the commissioner of conservation.
H. Except when prevented by weather conditions or conditions of mining,
grading shall begin within one year after mining of the affected land has been
Page 11 of 19
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-567 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 899
completed. Initial seeding or planting shall be made at the first appropriate time
following completion of grading. All affected lands shall be restored to a condition
capable of supporting their intended post-mining land use within thirty-six months
from completion of grading, as set forth by the approved five-year plan of
reclamation.
§980. Annual status reports
Within thirty days of the end of the first and subsequent years of mine
operations under an approved permit, all operators shall submit a report detailing
mining and reclamation activities during the previous mine operations period, such
reports shall include maps and descriptive narratives specifying all of the following:
(1) The location of the pit or pits by section, township, range, and parish,
with such other description as will identify the land which the operator has affected
by mining during the previous mining operations.
(2) The number of acres of affected land.
(3) The extent and acreage of reclamation accomplished on the affected land,
including grading and revegetation efforts, as of the anniversary date of permit
issuance.
(4) Designation of any deviation from the five-year plan of reclamation and
any updates or modifications filed as well as the reasons therefor.
§981. Completion of reclamation obligations
Whenever an operator shall have completed all requirements under the
provisions of this Chapter as to any affected land, or part thereof, he shall notify the
department and request an appropriate release. If the department determines that the
operator has completed reclamation requirements in accordance with the approved
five-year plan and achieved results appropriate to the use for which the areas were
reclaimed, the department shall not later than thirty days release the operator from
further obligations regarding such affected land, or part thereof.
Page 12 of 19
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-567 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 899
§982. Reclamation fee
A. For the purpose of providing revenue with which to administer the state's
noncoal mining and reclamation regulatory program, to meet the environmental
management needs of this state, and to reclaim abandoned noncoal mine lands, a
reclamation fee is hereby levied on the sale of minerals surface mined in Louisiana.
Such fee shall be imposed upon the owners at the time of sale and shall be paid by
the owner or proportionately by the owners thereof at the time fixed by the
department. The fee shall be three cents per ton for all minerals as defined in R.S.
30:975(11).
B. The payment of the fees and the making of any reports required to be filed
by the office of conservation shall be done by those actually engaged in the operation
of severing whether it be the owner of the soil, or other person severing from the soil
of another, or the owner of the natural resources minerals being severed from the soil
of another. The severer shall collect and withhold out of the value of the
proportionate parts of the total fee due by the respective owners of the minerals at
the time of the sale.
C. The monies received by the state treasurer from the fees levied pursuant
to this Section shall be credited to the state general fund.
D. On the day fixed by the department for the payment of the reclamation
fees required to be paid by this Section, the fees, with any penalties or interest
thereon, shall become a lien on the affected property of the taxpayer in this state,
whether such property is employed by the taxpayer in the prosecution of its business
or is in the hands of an assignee, trustee, or receiver for the benefit of creditors or
stockholders. The lien shall continue until the fees and penalties or interest thereon
are paid.
E. Penalties and interest on fees due pursuant to this Chapter shall be the
same as provided in Part IV of Chapter 18 of Subtitle II of Title 47 of the Louisiana
Revised Statutes of 1950.
§983. Inspections
Page 13 of 19
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-567 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 899
The department is designated as the agency to make mine inspections on
mineral and quarrying operations. Conservation agents may enter upon the lands of
the operator at all reasonable times, for the purposes of inspection, to determine
whether the operations are in compliance with the provisions of this Chapter.
§984. Violations; notice; hearings; enforcement
A.(1) The department shall notify the operator in writing by registered and
certified mail of any claimed violation of the provisions of this Chapter or the rules
and regulations of the department. If the operator denies the alleged violation, the
department shall hold a hearing on said charges. The hearing shall be held not less
than thirty days from the notice of hearing.
(2) At the hearing, the operator shall have the right to present evidence in
opposition to the claimed violation.
B.(1) If after the hearing, the department determines that a violation has
occurred, the department shall make detailed findings of the violation and the
necessary corrective measures and may include appropriate civil penalties. The
order shall provide a reasonable time, commensurate with the work to be done, for
the operator to perform the corrective measures.
(2) If the operator fails to perform the corrective work required by the office,
the department may contract for the work to be done. The department shall not issue
any permits to an operator who has failed to perform such corrective work, until such
obligations are met by the operator or his agent, as determined by the department.
C. The department shall institute proceedings to recover any damages and
expenses which the department may have sustained by reason of the default of the
operator. The proceedings shall be brought against the operator in the parish in
which the violation occurred or in East Baton Rouge Parish.
§985. Penalties
A. Any person required by this Chapter to have a permit who engages in
mining without a valid permit issued pursuant to this Chapter is guilty of a
misdemeanor, and on conviction, shall be fined not less than fifty dollars nor more
Page 14 of 19
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-567 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 899
than one thousand dollars. Each day of operations without the permit required by
this Chapter shall be deemed a separate violation.
B. A civil penalty may be assessed by the secretary to any permittee who
violates any permit condition or who violates any provision of this Chapter. The
penalty may be assessed only after the person charged with a violation has been
given an opportunity for a public hearing. If a complaint is filed by any person
alleging a violation, an investigation will be conducted by the department, and upon
finding a basis for such complaint a notice of such complaint will be served on the
operator. If the alleged violations are not corrected within ten days of notice to the
operator, the operator shall appear at a hearing before the secretary who shall issue
an order appropriate to the evidence presented, which order may include a civil
penalty not to exceed one thousand dollars for each violation. Each day of
operations under the violations shall be deemed a separate violation. An appeal of
the order may be made providing that such appeal is filed with the Nineteenth
Judicial District Court within ten days following the date of such order.
C. All civil penalties levied pursuant to this Section and collected shall be
placed in the state general fund.
§986. Designating areas unsuitable for noncoal surface mining
Any person having an interest which is or may be adversely affected shall
have the right to petition the secretary to have an area designated as unsuitable for
noncoal surface mining operations, or to have such a designation terminated. The
petition shall contain allegations of facts with supporting evidence which would tend
to establish the allegations. The secretary shall, within ten days of receipt of a
petition, publish a legal notice describing the petition and affected lands in the
official journal of each parish affected by the petition. Within sixty days after receipt
of the petition, the secretary shall make a determination of the validity of the
allegations contained in the petition and may designate the lands included in the
petition as unsuitable for noncoal surface mining, deny the petition as being without
standing or valid basis, or may hold a public hearing in the locality of the affected
Page 15 of 19
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-567 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 899
area, after appropriate notice and publication of the date, time, and location of such
hearing. After a person having an interest which is or may be adversely affected has
filed a petition and before the hearing, as required by this Subsection, any person
may intervene by filing allegations of facts with supporting evidence which would
tend to establish the allegations. Within thirty days after such hearing, the secretary
shall issue and furnish to the petitioner and any other party to the hearing, a written
decision regarding the petition, and the reasons supporting the decision. In the event
that all the petitioners enter into a stipulated agreement prior to the requested
hearing, and withdraw their request, a hearing need not be held.
§987. Exempt operations
A. Any state or political subdivision engaged in mining as defined in this
Chapter shall conform to all requirements of this Chapter, except that nothing
contained in this Chapter shall apply to lands or water bottoms subject to the
jurisdiction of the Department of Wildlife and Fisheries or political subdivisions, as
defined in Article VI, Section 44 of the Constitution of Louisiana, who are engaged
in noncommercial activities.
B. Excavation, grading, forming, or removal of minerals, as defined in this
Chapter, by an owner or holder of a possessory interest in the affected land for
construction or maintenance of access roads to or on his property, for other on-site
construction, or for the extraction of minerals other than lignite for his own
noncommercial use shall be exempt from the provisions of this Chapter, except that
all such operations shall be conducted in an environmentally acceptable manner.
C. All noncoal surface mining operations conducted to provide fill materials
through excavation of borrow pits for government-financed public works
construction activities where contractual requirements direct such excavation shall
be exempt from the permitting requirements of this Chapter, so as to avoid
duplication of regulatory authority over these operations.
Page 16 of 19
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-567 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 899
§988. Confidentiality
Information submitted to the department considered by the operator as
confidential concerning trade secrets or privileged commercial or financial
information which relates to competitive rights shall not be available for public
examination.
§989. Judicial review
All final decisions and orders of this office shall be subject to judicial review
of the acts of administrative agencies as provided for in the Administrative
Procedure Act.